Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202653-180.04
Minors; warning notice; posting.

(1) Every licensee of a place where alcoholic liquor is sold at retail shall display at all times in a prominent place a printed card with a minimum height of twenty inches and a width of fourteen inches, with each letter to be a minimum of one-fourth inch in height, which shall read as follows:

WARNING TO PERSONS UNDER 21YOU ARE SUBJECT TONOTIFICATION OF PARENTS OR GUARDIANANDYOU ARE SUBJECT TO A PENALTY OF UP TO$500 FINE3 MONTHS IN JAILOR BOTH IF YOU ARE UNDER 21 AND YOU CONSUME,PURCHASE, ATTEMPT TO PURCHASE,OR HAVE IN YOUR POSSESSIONALCOHOLIC LIQUOR IN THIS ESTABLISHMENT ANDWARNING TO ADULTSYOU ARE SUBJECT TO A PENALTY OF UP TO$1000 FINE1 YEAR IN JAILOR BOTHIF YOU ARE 21 OR OVER AND YOU PURCHASEALCOHOLIC LIQUORFOR A PERSON UNDER 21ANDWARNING TO PURCHASERS OF BEER KEGSPROPER IDENTIFICATION AND PURCHASER'S SIGNATUREARE REQUIREDLAWS OF THE STATE OF NEBRASKA

(2) Such warning sign may be provided electronically by the commission to the licensee.

Laws 1951, c. 174, § 1(5), p. 664;

Laws 1963, c. 313, § 1, p. 943;

Laws 1969, c. 440, § 3, p. 1474;

Laws 1980, LB 221, § 4;

Laws 1980, LB 848, § 19;

Laws 1984, LB 56, § 3;

Laws 1985, LB 493, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 332, § 7;

Laws 2001, LB 114, § 5;

Laws 2022, LB1204, § 9.